Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation, there is appropri-
ated to the Department of Education, for the biennium beginning  July 1, 2019, out of the
General Fund, the amount of $7,713,586,339 for the State School Fund.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$535,719,907 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses from  lottery moneys allocated from the Administrative Services Eco-
nomic Development Fund to the Department of Education for the State School Fund.
SECTION 3. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$107,693,754 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Department of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery funds, federal funds and funds  de-
scribed in section 4 of this 2019 Act, collected or received by the  Department of Education
for the State School Fund.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$643,000,000 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2019, as the  maximum limit for
payment of expenses by the  Department of Education from fees, moneys or other revenues,
including Miscellaneous Receipts, but excluding lottery  funds and federal funds, collected or
received by the Department of Education for the  State School Fund from the Fund for Stu-
dent Success established by section  __, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2019 (Enrolled House Bill
3427).
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding ORS 327.008 and 327.013, for the biennium beginning  July
1, 2019, the Department of Education:
(1) May spend up to $968,000 from the State School  Fund for the contract described in
ORS 329.488.
(2) May spend up to $1,600,000 from the State School Fund  for purposes related to the
Oregon Virtual School District.
(3) May spend up to  $2,850,375 from the State School Fund to provide lunches, at no
charge to the student, to students who are eligible for  reduced price lunches under the
United States Department of Agriculture’s current Income Eligibility Guidelines.
SECTION 6. The amount of $4,000,000 is transferred from  the State School Fund to the
Local Option Equalization Grants Account created in ORS 327.339.
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 1
SECTION 7. This 2019 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency is declared to exist, and  this 2019 Act takes effect
July 1, 2019.
Passed by House May 13, 2019
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate May 23, 2019
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2019
..................................................................................
Bev Clarno, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5016 (HB 5016-A) Page 2